Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.035

Service credit prohibited for certain members of committees, boards, and commissions and for certain appointive and elective officials.

(1) No person appointed to membership on any committee, board, or commission on or after July 1, 1976, who is compensated for service on such committee, board, or commission for fewer than ten days or seventy hours in any month, whichever amount is less, shall receive service credit for such service for that month: PROVIDED, That on and after October 1, 1977, appointive and elective officials who receive monthly compensation earnable from an employer in an amount equal to or less than ninety times the state minimum hourly wage shall not receive any service credit for such employment.

(2) No person appointed on or after June 9, 2022, to membership on any committee, board, or commission described in RCW 43.03.220 may receive service credit for service on such committee, board, or commission due to the payment of a stipend or allowance as authorized under RCW 43.03.220.

(3) This section does not apply to any person serving on a committee, board, or commission on June 30, 1976, who continued such service until subsequently appointed by the governor to a different committee, board, or commission.

[ 2022 c 245 s 8; 1987 c 146 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 17; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 4. Formerly RCW 41.40.165.]

NOTES:

Findings—2022 c 245: See note following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.